Hawaii statutes.
§322-31 Lien. The cost of the
improvements made or completed by the comptroller as determined and apportioned
pursuant to the provisions of this part shall constitute a lien upon the land
improved, which lien shall have priority over all other liens. [L 1896, c 61,
§7; am L 1911, c 112, §8; am L 1915, c 190, §8; RL 1925, §985; RL 1935, §1335;
RL 1945, §2726; RL 1955, §47-30; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §322-31]

Case Notes

Lien attaches to interest of person who as owner is in
control of land. 22 H. 327.

Cited: 31 H. 446, 449.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next